Hawaii statutes.
[§431C-51] Unfair trade practices. A
violation of this chapter shall be considered an unfair trade practice pursuant
to section 480-2 and subject to the penalties under chapter 480. [L 2012, c
256, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next